Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB235.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1804-C of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1804-C. Approval.* * *(c.3) Approval schedule.--Beginning in 2026, the Department of Community and Economic Development shall approve applications for two additional zones each calendar year.* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0235PN0241 - 2 - 1